Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2255.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of December 4, 1996 (P.L.911, No.147), known as the Telemarketer Registration Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." As follows:(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, 12345678910111213141516171819 including the ability to:(i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions made under subparagraph (i) into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence.* * *"Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content.* * *"Synthetic content." Information, including images, videos, audio clips and text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence.* * *Section 2. Section 5(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 5. Unlawful acts and penalties.(a) Acts enumerated.--The following acts are prohibited:* * *(11) Using artificial intelligence to:(i) Make a telemarketing solicitation call.(ii) Mimic the voice of a human on a telemarketing solicitation call.(iii) Select telephone numbers for telemarketing purposes.20260HB2255PN2953 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Change a telephone number to disguise the origin of a telemarketing solicitation call.(v) Otherwise interact with a consumer during a telemarketing solicitation call.* * *Section 3. Section 6 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 6. Violations.* * *(d) Violations relating to use of artificial intelligence.--(1) In addition to any other penalty available under this section or other law, a person that violates section 5(a)(11) shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed:(i) $25,000 for a first violation.(ii) $50,000 for a second violation.(iii) $100,000 for a third or subsequent violation.(2) An individual who has received a telemarketing solicitation call in violation of section 5(a)(11) may bring a private right of action in a court of common pleas in accordance with the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2255PN2953 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021